src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Moirfeolaíocht na nAinmfhocail Gaeilge (Morphology of Irish Nouns)
+Idf is no longer used with base form .. just +DefArt after article ...

## FEMININE NOUN continuation classes
Weak Plurals : 
Broad singular is made slender; plural already broad

- LEXICON Nf2-SINGULAR 

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D2; 

- LEXICON Nf2a-SINGULAR 

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D2a; 

- LEXICON Nf2-1 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G PL-TADA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(LEA)A; 

- LEXICON Nf2-1a 
- Nf2a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G PL-TADA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(LEA)A; 

### Weak Plurals : Broaden 

#### Singular already slender; plural is made broad

- LEXICON Nf2-2 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 

##### Weak Plurals : 

- LEXICON Nf2-3 

##### Weak Plurals : 

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(CAOL)E; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G PL-LEATHNÚ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(CAOL)E; 

- LEXICON Nf2-4 

- Nf2a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 

### STRONG PLURALS

- LEXICON Nf2-5 

- Nf2-SINGULAR; 

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-TE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-TE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-TE; 

- LEXICON Nf2-6 

- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nf2-7 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-Í; 

- LEXICON Nf2-8 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ACHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ACHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(E)ACHA; 

- LEXICON Nf2-9 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)THA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(LEA)THA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(LEA)THA; 

- LEXICON Nf2-10 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-TA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-TA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-TA; 

- LEXICON Nf2-11 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ANTA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ANTA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(E)ANTA; 

- LEXICON Nf2-12 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(LEA)A; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(LEA)A; 

- LEXICON Nf2-13 
- Nf2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(CAOL)E; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(CAOL)E; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(CAOL)E; 

### 3rd Declension
### Strong Plurals : +aí

an bheannacht -> na beannachtaí

- LEXICON Nf3-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D3; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V Voc-sg-0; 

- LEXICON Nf3a-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Ath Gen-sg-D3;  EXCEPTION t-> th,  t->[], dh ->t
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V Voc-sg-0; 

gamhain - gamhna (gs), midheamhain - midheamhna (gs)
- LEXICON Nf3b-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Coim Gen-sg-D3;  SYNC + a 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V Voc-sg-0; 

- LEXICON Nf3-1 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-AÍ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-AÍ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-AÍ; 

- LEXICON Nf3-2 
- Nf3a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath^Lea PL-AÍ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath^Lea PL-AÍ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath^Lea PL-AÍ; 

Strong Plurals :  +(e)anna

tóin -> tóineanna
scoth -> scothanna
EXCEPTION: an chuid -> na codanna see FIX file
EXCEPTION: an raith -> na rathanna see FIX file
- LEXICON Nf3-3 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nf3-4 
- Nf3a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-Í; 

- LEXICON Nf3-5 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Lea PL-TA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Lea PL-TA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Lea PL-TA; 

- LEXICON Nf3-6 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ACHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ACHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(E)ACHA; 

- LEXICON Nf3-6a 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(LEA)ACHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(LEA)ACHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(LEA)ACHA; 

- LEXICON Nf3-7 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-TE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-TE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-TE; 

Strong Plurals :  Broaden +anna

an chuid -> na codanna see FIX file
an raith -> na rathanna
an laith -> na lathanna
an luaith -> na luathanna
- LEXICON Nf3-8 
- Nf3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Lea PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Lea PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Lea PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nf4-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D4; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V Voc-sg-0; 

Strong Plurals : +í

an bhearna -> na bearnaí
an eala -> na healaí

- LEXICON Nf4-1 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-Í; 

Strong Plurals : Athrú e -> í

an aicme -> na haicmí (classes)
an táille -> na táillí (fees)

- LEXICON Nf4-2 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath PL-Í; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath PL-Í; 

Strong Plurals : 

- LEXICON Nf4-3 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath PL-TE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath PL-TE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath PL-TE; 

- LEXICON Nf4-4 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath PL-THE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath PL-THE; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath PL-THE; 

- LEXICON Nf4-5 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ACHA; 

- LEXICON Nf4-6 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nf4-7 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-(E)ANTA; 
various ending in vowel	! plurals +nna
- LEXICON Nf4-8 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-NNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-NNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-NNA; 
- LEXICON Nf4-9 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-ONNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-ONNA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-ONNA; 
- LEXICON Nf4-10 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C PL-OCHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G PL-OCHA; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V PL-OCHA; 
- LEXICON Nf4-11 
- Nf4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath PL-TÍ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath PL-TÍ; 
- +Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath PL-TÍ; 

Strong Plurals : Leathnú  +acha

an bheoir -> na beoracha (beers)

- LEXICON Nf5-1 

Gen Sg : Coim + ach
Strong Plurals : Coimriú +eacha

an chathaoir -> na cathaoireacha (chairs) (Note long vowel aoi is not sync.
an cathair -> na cathracha

- LEXICON Nf5-2 

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D5-2; 

Gen Sg : Coim + a
Strong Plurals : Coimriú +(e)acha
samhail -> samhla
anacair -> anacra
- LEXICON Nf5-2a 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D5-2a; 

Gen Sg : Coim + Slen + e
Strong Plurals : Coimriú +(e)acha
crithir - critre
fothair - foithre
- LEXICON Nf5-2b 

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D5-2b; 

- LEXICON Nf5-3 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 

- LEXICON Nf5-4 
- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D5-5; 

tarraingt - tarraingthe - tarraingtí
- LEXICON Nf5-7  11/04/08

- +Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G Gen-sg-D5-7; 

## MASCULINE NOUN continuation classes

- LEXICON Nm1-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G Gen-sg-D1; 
- +Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V Voc-sg-1; 

WEAK PLURALS (i.e. where the nominative and genitive plurals are different) 
TYPE 1 Nom pl. ends in conson. eg cat : cait, fear : fir, marcach: marcaigh 

- LEXICON Nm1-1 

- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-CAOLÚ; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G PL-TADA; 
- +Noun+Masc+Voc:^V PL-(LEA)A; 

TYPE 2 Nom pl. formed by adding -a eg cos : cosa, úll : úlla 

- LEXICON Nm1-2 

- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G PL-TADA; 

(TYPE 3) Nom pl. formed by adding -ta eg 

- LEXICON Nm1-3 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-TA; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G PL-TA; 

- LEXICON Nm1-4 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(LEA)THA; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(LEA)THA; 

- LEXICON Nm1-5 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-ATHRÚ; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G PL-ATHRÚ; 

- LEXICON Nm1-6 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 
- +Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G PL-(E)ANNA; 
- LEXICON Nm1-7 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Caol PL-Í; 

- LEXICON Nm1-8 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nm1-9 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim PL-(CAOL)E; 

- LEXICON Nm1-10 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim PL-(CAOL)EACHA; 

- LEXICON Nm1-11 
- Nm1-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ACHA; 
## 2nd Declension
sliabh -> na sléibhte 

- LEXICON Nm2-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 

- LEXICON Nm2-1 
- Nm2-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Caol PL-TE; 

- LEXICON Nm3-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
- LEXICON Nm3a-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 
3rd Declension
Strong Plurals : +í 
as in Nm7 but singular are different

eg. bádóir -> na bádóirí

- LEXICON Nm3-1 
- Nm3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-Í; 

Strong Plurals : +anna

eg. an bláth -> na bláthanna

- LEXICON Nm3-2 
- Nm3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 
Strong Plurals : +aí

- LEXICON Nm3-3 
- Nm3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-AÍ; 

gen briocht -> breachta
Strong Plurals : +aí
briocht -> briochtaí

- LEXICON Nm3-3a 
- Nm3a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-AÍ; 

Strong Plurals : +anna
eg. an bláth -> na bláthanna

- LEXICON Nm3-4a 

^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: io -> ea (bior, crios) 
and this is done using ^Ath (change)
pl bior -> bioranna

- Nm3a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 

### Strong Plurals : Athrú +anna (io->ea)
eg. an cith -> na ceathanna
- LEXICON Nm3-4 
- Nm3a-SINGULAR; 
^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: cith -> ceatha, greim -> greama
and this is done using ^Ath (change)
pl also broadened cith -> ceathanna
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath^Lea PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nm3-5 
- Nm3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ACHA; 

- LEXICON Nm3-6 
- Nm3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 

- LEXICON Nm3-7 
- Nm3-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-TA; 

- LEXICON Nm3-8 
- Nm3a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(LEA)A; 

- LEXICON Nm3-8a  sliocht - sleachta gs & pl
- Nm3a-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath PL-(LEA)A; 

Strong Plurals : +í

(A) nouns ending in -ín (a diminutive)
smidiríní (smithereens) no singular
eg. an cailín -> na cailíní (girls)
eg. an báidín -> na báidíní (small boats)

(B) nouns ending in -a
eg. an balla -> na ballaí (walls)

- LEXICON Nm4-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 

- LEXICON Nm4-1 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-Í; 

- LEXICON Nm4-2 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath PL-Í; 

- LEXICON Nm4-3 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath PL-TE; 

- LEXICON Nm4-4 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath PL-THE; 

- LEXICON Nm4-5 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ACHA; 

- LEXICON Nm4-6 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-NNA; 

- LEXICON Nm4-7 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(E)ANNA; 

- LEXICON Nm4-8 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-ITE; 

- LEXICON Nm4-9 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-ONNA; 

- LEXICON Nm4-10 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-OCHA; 

- LEXICON Nm4-11 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-(LEA)THA; 

01/04/08
- LEXICON Nm4-12 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-AÍ; 

- LEXICON Nm4-13 
- Nm4-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-THANNA; 

Strong Plurals : +idí
an fiche -> na fichidí (the twenties) eidí needs correcting
an caoga -> na caogaidí (the fifties)
- LEXICON Nm5-1 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg;  
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C PL-IDÍ; 

- LEXICON Nm5-2 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg;  

- LEXICON Nm5-3 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg;  

GS +the
- LEXICON Nm5-4 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 

GS +te
- LEXICON Nm5-5-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 

- LEXICON Nm5-5  PL +TÍ 
- Nm5-5-SINGULAR; 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Atht PL-Í; 

GS +tha
PL +thaí
bascadh - basctha - bascthaí
- LEXICON Nm5-6 

GS +ta
- LEXICON Nm5-7-SINGULAR 
- +Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C Nom-sg; 

- LEXICON Nm5-7 
- Nm5-7-SINGULAR; 

moladh / gs = molta / pl = moltaí
- LEXICON Nm5-7a 
- Nm5-7-SINGULAR; 
